District of Columbia statutes.
31-4112

Binding effect of orders issued in United States District Court.

An order issued by any district court of the United States enjoining a risk retention group from soliciting or selling insurance, or operating in any state, or in all states or in any territory or possession of the United States, upon finding that such a group is in hazardous financial or financially impaired condition shall be enforceable in the courts of the state.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-46, § 13, 40 DCR 6082
1981 Ed., § 35-2912.